New Jersey, session 222, A4003.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a sports wagering licensee or contracted operator thereof shall not offer promotional credits, incentives, bonuses, complimentaries, or similar benefits designed to induce a person to wager, to any person who is currently utilizing responsible gaming programs, including, but not limited to, self-exclusion programs, time or wager limits, deposit restrictions, or any other responsible gaming programs that may be offered by the sports wagering licensee or their contracted operator, or any responsible gaming programs required by the Casino Control Act, P.L.1977, c.110 (C.5:12-1 et seq.), or provided by rule or regulation promulgated by the division or commission. b.  Any sports wagering licensee or contracted operator thereof that violates the prohibition set forth in this section shall be fined not less than $500 per offense. c.  The division, in consultation with the commission, shall promulgate, in accordance with the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.